Alaska, session 34, SB118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 04 to read: 05 SHORT TITLE. This Act may be known as the University of Alaska Faculty 06 Representation Act. 07 * Sec. 2. AS 14.40.120 is amended to read: 08 Sec. 14.40.120. University governed by Board of Regents. The University of 09 Alaska shall be governed by a Board of Regents consisting of 12 [11] regents. 10 * Sec. 3. AS 14.40.130 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 11 (f) In addition to satisfying the requirements in (a) of this section, at least one 12 of the 12 regents must be a current full-time faculty member who is employed at and 13 has acquired tenure at the University of Alaska Anchorage, the University of Alaska 14 Fairbanks, or the University of Alaska Southeast based on the guidelines of that 15 campus. A person appointed as a regent under this subsection forfeits the office if the 01 person is no longer a full-time, tenured faculty member. The governor shall appoint a 02 successor from the list of faculty member nominees submitted under AS 14.40.150(c) 03 within 60 days after a forfeiture or vacancy in the office, subject to confirmation by 04 the legislature under AS 14.40.150(a). 05 * Sec. 4. AS 14.40.140 is amended to read: 06 Sec. 14.40.140. Term of office. Except for a student regent as specified in 07 AS 14.40.150(b) and a faculty member regent as specified in AS 14.40.150(c), the 08 term of office of a regent is eight years. The term of office begins on the first Monday 09 in February of the year in which the appointment is made. Each regent serves until a 10 successor is appointed and qualifies. 11 * Sec. 5. AS 14.40.150 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 12 (c) At least one member of the Board of Regents must be a faculty member. 13 The faculty member shall be appointed from a list of nominees submitted to the 14 governor. The governor shall make the appointment from the list within 60 days after 15 the list is submitted. The list must consist of the names of two faculty members 16 selected by each of the three faculty senates of the University of Alaska, for a total of 17 six nominees, after an election is held by each faculty senate. Elections shall be 18 conducted under rules established by the Office of the Governor. The term of office of 19 a regent appointed under this subsection is two years. The term of office begins June 1 20 of the year in which the appointment is made. An appointment of a successor made 21 under AS 14.40.130(f) shall be for the unexpired term of the original appointee. 22 * Sec. 6. AS 14.40.200 is amended to read: 23 Sec. 14.40.200. Quorum. Corporate business may not be transacted at any 24 meeting of the Board of Regents unless at least seven [SIX] regents are present, the 25 majority of the whole board to approve the same. 26 * Sec. 7. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 27 read: 28 TRANSITION: INITIAL APPOINTMENT. The University of Alaska shall hold 29 elections for nominees and submit the list of nominees to the governor as required by 30 AS 14.40.150(c), added by sec. 4 of this Act, on or before February 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.